Utah statutes.
78B-5-410.   Prejudgment and judgment interest.
(1)  With respect to a foreign-money claim, recovery of prejudgment interest
and the rate of interest to be applied in the action or distribution
proceeding are matters of the substantive law governing the right to recovery
under the conflict of laws rules of this state.
(2)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1), an increase or decrease in the amount of
prejudgment interest otherwise payable may be made in a foreign-money judgment
to the extent required by the law of this state governing a failure to make or
accept an offer of settlement or offer of judgment, or conduct by a party or
its attorney causing undue delay or expense.
(3)  A judgment on a foreign-money claim bears interest at the same rate
applicable to other judgments of this state.
